Nebraska, session 109, LB227.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB227 LB227
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 75-311, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
75-311 (1)(a) (1) A certificate shall be issued to any qualified
applicant authorizing the whole or any part of the operations covered by
the application if it is found after notice and hearing that (i) (a) the
applicant is fit, willing, and able properly to perform the service
proposed and to conform to the provisions of sections 75-301 to 75-322
and the requirements, rules, and regulations of the commission under such
sections and (ii) (b) the proposed service, to the extent to be
authorized by the certificate, whether regular or irregular, is or will
be required by the present or future public convenience and necessity.
Otherwise the application shall be denied.
(b) The burden shall be on the applicant to show (i) that they are
fit, willing, and able properly to perform the service proposed and to
conform to the provisions of sections 75-301 to 75-322 and the
requirements, rules, and regulations of the commission and (ii) that the
proposed service will be responsive to a public demand or need.
(c) The burden shall be on any protestant to the application to show
that (i) existing carriers are currently meeting, or will meet, the
proposed need and (ii) that even if the applicant's service will be
responsive to a public demand or need, that applicant would not be able
to serve this need in a specified manner without endangering or impairing
the operations of existing carriers contrary to the public interest.
(2)(a) (2) A permit shall be issued to any qualified applicant
therefor authorizing in whole or in part the operations covered by the
application if it appears after notice and hearing from the application
or from any hearing held on the application that (i) (a) the applicant is
fit, willing, and able properly to perform the service of a contract
carrier by motor vehicle and to conform to the provisions of such
sections and the lawful requirements, rules, and regulations of the
commission under such sections and (ii) (b) the proposed operation, to
-2-

LB227 LB227
2025 2025
the extent authorized by the permit, will be consistent with the public
interest by providing services designed to meet the distinct needs of
each individual customer or a specifically designated class of customers
as defined in subdivision (7) of section 75-302. Otherwise the
application shall be denied.
(b) For a designation of authority to provide medicaid nonemergency
medical transportation services pursuant to a contract with (i) the
Department of Health and Human Services, (ii) a medicaid-managed care
organization under contract with the department, or (iii) another agent
working on the department's behalf as provided under section 75-303.01,
in determining whether the authorization will be consistent with the
public interest, the commission shall consult with the Director of
Medicaid and Long-Term Care of the Division of Medicaid and Long-Term
Care of the department or his or her designee.
(3)(a) (3) A designation of authority shall be issued to any
regulated motor carrier holding a certificate under subsection (1) of
this section or a permit under subsection (2) of this section authorizing
such carrier to provide medicaid nonemergency medical transportation
services pursuant to a contract with (i) the Department of Health and
Human Services, (ii) a medicaid-managed care organization under contract
with the department, or (iii) another agent working on the department's
behalf as provided under section 75-303.01, if it is found after notice
and hearing from the application or from any hearing held on the
application that the authorization is or will be required by the present
or future convenience and necessity to serve the distinct needs of
medicaid clients.
(b) The burden shall be on the applicant to show that the proposed
service will be responsive to a public demand or need. The burden shall
be on any protestant to the application to show that (i) existing
carriers are currently meeting, or will meet, the proposed need and (ii)
that even if the applicant's service will be responsive to a public
-3-

LB227 LB227
2025 2025
demand or need, that applicant would not be able to serve this need in a
specified manner without endangering or impairing the operations of
existing carriers contrary to the public interest.
(c) In determining whether the authorization is or will be required
by the present or future convenience and necessity to serve the distinct
needs of medicaid clients, the commission shall consult with the Director
of Medicaid and Long-Term Care of the Division of Medicaid and Long-Term
Care of the department or his or her designee.
(4) Until July 1, 2021, no person shall at the same time hold a
certificate as a common carrier and a permit as a contract carrier for
transportation of household goods by motor vehicles over the same route
or within the same territory unless the commission finds that it is
consistent with the public interest and with the policy declared in
section 75-301.
(5) Until July 1, 2021, after the issuance of a certificate or
permit, the commission shall review the operations of all common or
contract carriers who hold authority from the commission to determine
whether there are insufficient operations in the transportation of
household goods to justify the commission's finding that such common or
contract carrier has willfully failed to perform transportation under
sections 75-301 to 75-322 and rules and regulations promulgated under
such sections. If the commission determines that there are insufficient
operations, then the commission shall commence proceedings under section
75-315 to revoke the certificate or permit involved.
(4) (6) This section shall not apply to transportation network
companies holding a permit under section 75-324 or operations pursuant to
a contract authorized by sections 75-303.02 and 75-303.03.
Sec. 2. Section 75-342, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
75-342 No transportation network company or participating driver
shall provide transportation for any person under contract with the
-4-

LB227 LB227
2025 2025
Department of Health and Human Services or any contractors of the
Department of Health and Human Services without specific authorization
from the commission. The commission shall grant specific authorization to
a requesting transportation network company or participating driver,
unless a protestant shows that (1) existing carriers are currently
meeting, or will meet, the proposed need for the proposed service and (2)
that even if the applicant's service will be responsive to a public
demand or need, that applicant would not be able to serve this need in a
specified manner without endangering or impairing the operations of
existing carriers contrary to the public interest. In order to receive
such authorization, the transportation network company or participating
driver shall demonstrate that such service is or will be required by the
present or future public convenience and necessity.
Sec. 3. Original section 75-342, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 75-311, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
-5-